District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.324

Reporting requirements.

Beginning December 1, 2014, the grant-managing entity shall submit a bimonthly report to the Council of all District funds allocated, which includes:

(1)

Detailed subgrantee data;

(2)

Performance measures and performance outcomes under each subgrant;

(3)

The specific services provided under each subgrant;

(4)

The entity providing the services, if one other than the subgrantee;

(5)

The time period of delivery of the services;

(6)

The type of service provided;

(7)

The actual amount paid for the services; and

(8)

The amount of other expenditures under the subgrant, if any.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 5145, 61 DCR 9990